Massachusetts, session 194th, H2418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 48E the
following section:-
Section 48F. All establishments which serve food will be required to identify in English
the presence of ingredients that contain protein derived from milk, eggs, fish, crustacean
shellfish, tree nuts, peanuts, wheat, or soybeans in the list of ingredients or to say “contains”
followed by the name of the source of the food allergen after or adjacent to the list of food
products offered. Said list shall be listed on menus or separate food allergen list readily available
to patrons and employees or posted in a location easily viewable by all patrons and employees.
Food allergen list requirements may be modified by direction of the department of public health.
of 1